Hawaii statutes.
[§431:2-201.3 Criminal convictions; consent
to engage in business.] (a) Any person who is engaged in the business of
insurance or who is about to engage in the business of insurance in this State
and who has been convicted of any felony shall request the commissioner's
written consent to engage in the business of insurance.

(b) After receipt of the request, the
commissioner, in writing, may:

(1) Consent to the person engaging in the business of
insurance;

(2) Provide a limited consent; or

(3) Deny the individual the privilege of engaging in
the business of insurance.

(c) Any person who fails to submit the request
as required by this section and who engages in the business of insurance
without the written consent of the commissioner shall be in violation of this
chapter and subject to the fines and penalties provided under this chapter.

(d) The commissioner may prescribe the format
and content of the form used to request the commissioner's written consent to
engage in the business of insurance. [L 2000, c 73, §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next